District of Columbia statutes.
44-2103

Repealed

Payments to Superintendent to be credited to appropriations for care of patients.

Repealed.

Aug. 4, 1947, 61 Stat. 751, ch. 478, § 3
Nov. 8, 1984, 98 Stat. 3369, Pub. L. 98-621, § 10(d)(1)
1981 Ed., § 32-603.
1973 Ed., § 32-403.
Section 11(b) of Pub. L. 98-621 makes § 10 of that act effective on October 1, 1987.